Vermont, session 2025-2026, S205.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. AI DATA CENTER MORATORIUM AND REPORT
(a) Moratorium. To protect the public safety and welfare and safeguard the
rights of ratepayers in Vermont, no person shall be permitted to operate an
artificial intelligence (AI) data center or to in any way begin site preparation
for or commence construction of an AI data center in this State prior to July 1,
2030. The purpose of this temporary moratorium is to allow time for the
VT LEG #385431 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.205
2026 Page 2 of 4
appropriate regulatory entities to study and develop a regulatory regime
applicable to AI data centers in Vermont that best serves the general good.
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “AI data center” means a facility that requires greater than 100
megawatts of new load dedicated to AI inference, training, simulation, or
synthetic data generation.
(2) “Person” has the same meaning as in 1 V.S.A. § 128.
(3) “Ratepayer” means a member of any electric ratepayer class in
Vermont, but not including an AI data center.
(c) Investigation and report.
(1) The Public Utility Commission, with input from the Department of
Public Service and all other interested parties, shall open an investigation into
the construction and operation of AI data centers in Vermont. The purpose of
the investigation is for the Commission to develop findings and
recommendations related to the impact AI data center deployment would have
in this State and the regulatory regime that would best serve the general good
of the State.
(2) On or before January 15, 2027, the Commission shall report the
findings and recommendations developed pursuant to this section to the House
Committees on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and on Environment and the
Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy.
VT LEG #385431 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.205
2026 Page 3 of 4
(d) Considerations. In developing the report required by this section, the
Public Utility Commission shall consider:
(1) the increased energy load required to power an AI data center;
(2) water consumption necessary to support the cooling of computing
equipment in an AI data center;
(3) the environmental impacts of an AI data center with respect to water
quality and availability, air quality, local ecosystems, noise emissions, and the
availability of surrounding land for other purposes, including farming,
conservation, recreation, and housing;
(4) strategies for maintaining the reliability and security of the power
grid;
(5) strategies for promoting energy efficiency and renewable energy
initiatives consistent with Vermont’s climate goals;
(6) a cost-allocation model that would hold all other electric ratepayers
harmless from the increased energy demand necessary to operate an AI data
center, including any associated costs for local, State, or regional grid
upgrades;
(7) the impact, both positive and negative, an AI data center would have
on the Vermont economy, particularly regarding workforce opportunities, local
businesses, and economic growth, generally;
VT LEG #385431 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.205
2026 Page 4 of 4
(8) environmental justice initiatives, particularly regarding the location
of an AI data center;
(9) local and State permitting requirements that would minimize any
adverse effects of the construction and operation of AI data centers in
Vermont; and
(10) any other matters deemed relevant by the Public Utility
Commission.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385431 v.2